Illinois, session 104th, HB3350.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Patient Access to Pharmacy Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7    (a) It is within the traditional authority of the State to 8regulate the acquisition and delivery of drugs to pharmacies 9and providers.10    (b) Drug manufacturers are impeding access to lifesaving 11drugs to Illinois residents, especially those in rural and 12medically underserved communities, by limiting or placing 13conditions on acquisition and delivery of drugs purchased 14through the federal 340B drug discount program by 340B covered 15entities that utilize contract pharmacies to distribute 340B 16drugs.17    (c) The federal 340B statute is silent on distribution of 18340B-acquired drugs to 340B covered entities and their 19contract pharmacy partners.20    (d) The State's compelling interest in preserving and 21improving access to health care services requires it to ensure 22that 340B covered entities continue to be allowed to contract 23with pharmacies to receive 340B drugs and dispense them to the   HB3350- 2 -LRB104 09643 BAB 19709 b1patients of 340B covered entities in accordance with federal 2law.3    (e) That addressing accessibility of these life-saving 4medications is a matter of health, safety, and welfare for the 5people of the State of Illinois. 6    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "340B drug discount program" means the program established 8under Section 340B of the federal Public Health Service Act, 942 U.S.C. 256b.10    "340B contract pharmacy" means any pharmacy that is under 11contract with a 340B covered entity to dispense 340B drugs on 12behalf of the 340B covered entity and is either (i) located in 13Illinois and qualifies as a pharmacy under Section 3 of the 14Pharmacy Practice Act; or (ii) is located in a state, 15commonwealth, or territory of the United States, other than 16Illinois, and dispenses 340B drugs on behalf of the 340B 17covered entity.18    "340B covered entity" means an entity in Illinois that 19qualifies as a covered entity under Section 340B of the 20federal Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4).21    "340B drug" means a drug that has been subject to any offer 22for reduced prices by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 23256b and is purchased by a 340B covered entity. 24    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 25Professional Regulation.  HB3350- 3 -LRB104 09643 BAB 19709 b1    "Manufacturer" has the meaning given to that term in the 2Wholesale Drug Distribution Licensing Act.3    "Person" means and includes a natural person, partnership, 4association, corporation, or any other legal business entity, 5but does not include any federal or State government entity or 6body.7    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 8Professional Regulation. 9    Section 15. Protection of patient access to pharmacy.10    (a) No person, including a pharmaceutical manufacturer, 11may deny, restrict, prohibit, condition, or otherwise 12interfere with, either directly or indirectly, the acquisition 13of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B 14covered entity or a 340B contract pharmacy authorized to 15receive 340B drugs on behalf of the 340B covered entity unless 16such receipt is prohibited by federal law.17    (b) No person, including a pharmaceutical manufacturer, 18may impose any restriction on the ability of a 340B covered 19entity to contract with or designate a 340B contract pharmacy 20including restrictions relating to the number, location, 21ownership, or type of 340B contract pharmacy.22    (c) No person, including a pharmaceutical manufacturer, 23may require or compel a 340B covered entity or 340B contract 24pharmacy to:25        (1) submit or otherwise provide ingredient cost or   HB3350- 4 -LRB104 09643 BAB 19709 b1    pricing data pertinent to 340B drugs unless required by 2    State or federal law;3        (2) institute requirements in any way relating to how 4    a 340B covered entity manages its inventory of 340B drugs 5    that are not required by a State or federal agency, 6    including requirements relating to the frequency or scope 7    of audits of inventory management systems of a 340B 8    covered entity or a 340B contract pharmacy; or9        (3) submit data or information that is not required by 10    State or federal law as a condition for a 340B covered 11    entity, its 340B contract pharmacy, or a location 12    otherwise authorized by a 340B covered entity to receive 13    340B drugs.14    (d) Each individual saleable unit, as such term is defined 15in 21 U.S.C. 360eee-11, of 340B drugs that is subject to a 16prohibited act in subsections (a) and (b) shall constitute a 17separate violation of this Act. Each communication received by 18a 340B covered entity or 340B contract pharmacy in violation 19of subsection (c) shall constitute a separate violation of 20this Act. 21    Section 20. Enforcement. 22    (a) The Department is authorized to enforce this Act and 23investigate possible violations of this Act by any person, 24including a pharmaceutical manufacturer, including, but not 25limited to, the issuance of subpoenas to:  HB3350- 5 -LRB104 09643 BAB 19709 b1        (1) require the person, including a pharmaceutical 2    manufacturer, to file a statement or report or answer 3    interrogatories in writing as to all information relevant 4    to the alleged violations;5        (2) examine under oath any person, including a 6    pharmaceutical manufacturer, who possesses knowledge or 7    information directly related to the alleged violations; or8        (3) examine any record, book, document, account, or 9    paper necessary to investigate the alleged violation.10    (b) If the Department determines that there is a reason to 11believe that any person, including a pharmaceutical 12manufacturer, has violated this Act, the Secretary may, in the 13name of the People of the State of Illinois, through the 14Attorney General of the State of Illinois or the State's 15Attorney of a county in which the action is brought, bring an 16action to obtain, and a court may order:17        (1) temporary, preliminary, or permanent injunctive 18    relief for any act, policy, or practice that violates this 19    Act;20        (2) money damages to be paid to the 340B covered 21    entity as a result of the violation of this Section;22        (3) the assessment of a civil penalty of up to $10,000 23    for each violation of Section 15; or24        (4) any other relief.25        26    (c) Whenever a 340B covered entity or 340B contract   HB3350- 6 -LRB104 09643 BAB 19709 b1pharmacy has reason to believe that any person, including a 2pharmaceutical manufacturer, has violated Section 15, a 340B 3covered entity or 340B contract pharmacy may bring a civil 4action to obtain, and a court may order:5        (1) temporary, preliminary, or permanent injunctive 6    relief for any act, policy, or practice that violates this 7    Act;8        (2) money damages to be paid to the 340B covered 9    entity as a result of the violation of this Section;10        (3) the assessment of a civil penalty of up to $10,000 11    for each violation of Section 15;12        (4) reimbursement for the costs and reasonable 13    attorney's fees incurred in bringing the action; or14        (5) any other relief.15    (d) The actions described in subsections (b) and (c) may 16be consolidated or combined if a court believes that an action 17in such form is in the best interests of judicial economy. If 18an action brought under subsection (b) involves the same or 19similar allegations as an action brought under subsection (c), 20then the actions may be combined. 21    Section 25. Preemption. 22    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be construed or applied to be 23less restrictive than federal law for a person regulated by 24this Act.25    (b) Nothing in this Act shall be construed or applied in a   HB3350- 7 -LRB104 09643 BAB 19709 b1manner that would conflict with:2        (1) applicable federal law; or3        (2) other laws of this State if the State law is 4    compatible with applicable federal law.5    (c) Limited distribution of a drug required under 21 6U.S.C. 355-1 may not to be construed as a violation of this 7Act. 8    Section 97. Severability. If any provision of this Act or 9its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, 10the invalidity of that provision or application does not 11affect other provisions or applications of this Act that can 12be given effect without the invalid provision or application. 13Each paragraph defining "340B contract pharmacy" in Section 10 14is severable. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.